Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.520

Posting of department of health information.

(1) Within existing resources, each educational service district that maintains a website must post a prominent link on their homepage to information from the department of health provided in accordance with RCW 70.54.490 that addresses substance use trends, overdose symptoms and response, and the secure storage of prescription drugs, over-the-counter medications, and firearms and ammunition.

(2) Each educational service district, for the purpose of informing students, families, and other interested persons about available health and safety resources, must also make the information from the department of health accessible through other internet-based communications, such as social media accounts used by the educational service district and through other digital and nondigital communications of the educational service district. Postings required by this subsection must be made multiple times annually and no less frequently than quarterly.

[ 2023 c 173 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 173: See note following RCW 70.54.490.